Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-417.03
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Law Enforcement Officers Retirement Survey Act:

(1) Committee means the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature;

(2) Law enforcement officer means any police officer, sheriff, and deputy sheriff employed by a political subdivision and any conservation officer employed by the state;

(3) Political subdivision means any political subdivision of this state which employs police officers, sheriffs, or deputy sheriffs, but does not include a city of the metropolitan class, a city of the primary class, or a county containing a city of the metropolitan class; and

(4) Retirement system means the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems.

Laws 2007, LB328, § 13.